Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.410

Addresses in filing.

If a provision of this chapter other than RCW 23.95.445(1)(d) requires that a record state an address, the record must state:

(1) A street address in this state; and

(2) A mailing address in this state, if different from the address described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1403.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.